Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska84-1115
Officers; alternates; assumption of power; disputes; how settled.

(1) Disputes of fact with respect to the right of an alternate to assume the powers and duties of an office, or to the right of an acting officer to continue to serve as such, shall be determined and adjudicated by the following named officials, whose decision in each instance shall be final:

(a) As to all state officers, by the Governor; Provided, that the Governor, within his sound discretion, may delegate this responsibility to another state officer or officers, except as to disputes relating to the officer or officers so designated; and

(b) As to all other obligated officers, by the district judge of the district in which the political subdivision concerned, or the major portion thereof, is located; or, if there are two or more district judges in that district, by the senior thereof.

(2) Subsection (1) of this section shall not apply to a dispute of fact relative to the office of Governor, or to the office of any member of the Legislature. Nor shall it be construed as limiting or affecting in any manner the right of a regularly elected or appointed officer or successor to have adjudicated in the courts, as provided by the Constitution of Nebraska and laws of this state, his authority to assume or hold such office.

Laws 1959, c. 457, § 15, p. 1521.